lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3744 Y 1
SFX 3744 n shes n
SFX 1017 Y 1
SFX 1017 a ina a
SFX 1667 Y 1
SFX 1667 p shes p
SFX 4607 Y 1
SFX 4607 r shes r
SFX 1606 Y 1
SFX 1606 a el a
SFX 1237 Y 1
SFX 1237 e ina e
SFX 3683 Y 1
SFX 3683 l tely l
SFX 3811 Y 1
SFX 3811 o ree o
SFX 2925 Y 1
SFX 2925 d el d
SFX 2923 Y 1
SFX 2923 a elle a
SFX 1871 Y 1
SFX 1871 n ri's n
SFX 3054 Y 1
SFX 3054 t und t
SFX 4698 Y 1
SFX 4698 p ri's p
SFX 4400 Y 1
SFX 4400 t unt t
SFX 2238 Y 1
SFX 2238 a een a
SFX 3682 Y 1
SFX 3682 r tely r
SFX 4524 Y 1
SFX 4524 s tely s
SFX 3923 Y 1
SFX 3923 d nder d
SFX 2415 Y 1
SFX 2415 g mps g
SFX 3922 Y 1
SFX 3922 g nder g
SFX 4399 Y 1
SFX 4399 t unted t
SFX 624 Y 1
SFX 624 e ical e
SFX 3280 Y 1
SFX 3280 l nder l
SFX 4379 Y 1
SFX 4379 t vage's t
SFX 3164 Y 1
SFX 3164 n rri n
SFX 2788 Y 1
SFX 2788 m nder m
SFX 24 Y 1
SFX 24 e ions e
SFX 1672 Y 1
SFX 1672 n rry n
SFX 3193 Y 1
SFX 3193 e re's e
SFX 2511 Y 1
SFX 2511 d ffs d
SFX 2453 Y 1
SFX 2453 e ivity e
SFX 4654 Y 1
SFX 4654 p rry p
SFX 3443 Y 1
SFX 3443 e ffs e
SFX 3038 Y 1
SFX 3038 t uter's t
SFX 1218 Y 1
SFX 1218 d ntly d
SFX 1996 Y 1
SFX 1996 a ena a
SFX 924 Y 1
SFX 924 n usness's n
SFX 1460 Y 1
SFX 1460 g iled g
SFX 4718 Y 1
SFX 4718 i re's i
SFX 4851 Y 1
SFX 4851 m no m
SFX 3624 Y 1
SFX 3624 t unders t
SFX 4839 Y 1
SFX 4839 l ntly l
SFX 3255 Y 1
SFX 3255 e ologists e
SFX 2362 Y 1
SFX 2362 n re's n
SFX 780 Y 1
SFX 780 e ition e
SFX 2698 Y 1
SFX 2698 a sa a
SFX 2361 Y 1
SFX 2361 p re's p
SFX 2697 Y 1
SFX 2697 e sa e
SFX 3263 Y 1
SFX 3263 l nting l
SFX 3262 Y 1
SFX 3262 m nting m
SFX 4578 Y 1
SFX 4578 n son's n
SFX 4065 Y 1
SFX 4065 a ises a
SFX 4180 Y 1
SFX 4180 a ess a
SFX 3079 Y 1
SFX 3079 l tionally l
SFX 4682 Y 1
SFX 4682 e ring e
SFX 2366 Y 1
SFX 2366 a ra's a
SFX 491 Y 1
SFX 491 e ises e
SFX 4117 Y 1
SFX 4117 e iary e
SFX 2538 Y 1
SFX 2538 d ed's d
SFX 4710 Y 1
SFX 4710 p reness p
SFX 3768 Y 1
SFX 3768 n sa n
SFX 1875 Y 1
SFX 1875 e ra's e
SFX 921 Y 1
SFX 921 c zers c
SFX 1233 Y 1
SFX 1233 e isations e
SFX 4911 Y 1
SFX 4911 g mper g
SFX 3377 Y 1
SFX 3377 e ifiers e
SFX 1319 Y 1
SFX 1319 e ishly e
SFX 2728 Y 1
SFX 2728 i ra's i
SFX 1459 Y 1
SFX 1459 g iling g
SFX 3796 Y 1
SFX 3796 n ring n
SFX 1205 Y 1
SFX 1205 p ring p
SFX 4157 Y 1
SFX 4157 c fication's c
SFX 1209 Y 1
SFX 1209 n ra's n
SFX 3823 Y 1
SFX 3823 o ra's o
SFX 4196 Y 1
SFX 4196 d eps d
SFX 4368 Y 1
SFX 4368 p vers p
SFX 2277 Y 1
SFX 2277 s zers s
SFX 3313 Y 1
SFX 3313 g llets g
SFX 1155 Y 1
SFX 1155 e izer e
SFX 4943 Y 1
SFX 4943 a ma a
SFX 1588 Y 1
SFX 1588 e ifications e
SFX 3599 Y 1
SFX 3599 s vers s
SFX 2296 Y 1
SFX 2296 a us a
SFX 584 Y 1
SFX 584 t vers t
SFX 1492 Y 1
SFX 1492 b cker's b
SFX 2063 Y 1
SFX 2063 e us e
SFX 2902 Y 1
SFX 2902 d ffing d
SFX 3444 Y 1
SFX 3444 e ffing e
SFX 2152 Y 1
SFX 2152 m nk's m
SFX 1954 Y 1
SFX 1954 e idness's e
SFX 386 Y 1
SFX 386 i us i
SFX 317 Y 1
SFX 317 a um's a
SFX 1215 Y 1
SFX 1215 e ousness's e
SFX 4750 Y 1
SFX 4750 m phically m
SFX 3877 Y 1
SFX 3877 a ology's a
SFX 3629 Y 1
SFX 3629 c um's c
SFX 3518 Y 1
SFX 3518 a ce's a
SFX 2429 Y 1
SFX 2429 l ma l
SFX 1388 Y 1
SFX 1388 d sion d
SFX 2065 Y 1
SFX 2065 e um's e
SFX 603 Y 1
SFX 603 n us n
SFX 4950 Y 1
SFX 4950 d lts d
SFX 2145 Y 1
SFX 2145 e ology's e
SFX 766 Y 1
SFX 766 o us o
SFX 4339 Y 1
SFX 4339 a ze a
SFX 3966 Y 1
SFX 3966 e lts e
SFX 2800 Y 1
SFX 2800 g lts g
SFX 394 Y 1
SFX 394 c ze c
SFX 4672 Y 1
SFX 4672 p rkier p
SFX 2193 Y 1
SFX 2193 e ioning e
SFX 2609 Y 1
SFX 2609 t us t
SFX 1396 Y 1
SFX 1396 d rs d
SFX 4246 Y 1
SFX 4246 b ckings b
SFX 3628 Y 1
SFX 3628 o um's o
SFX 2778 Y 1
SFX 2778 c ng's c
SFX 1004 Y 1
SFX 1004 e ng's e
SFX 77 Y 1
SFX 77 e or's e
SFX 4448 Y 1
SFX 4448 s tton s
SFX 4520 Y 1
SFX 4520 s teness's s
SFX 1282 Y 1
SFX 1282 e ths e
SFX 4003 Y 1
SFX 4003 e lia e
SFX 3908 Y 1
SFX 3908 m ng's m
SFX 3130 Y 1
SFX 3130 a st a
SFX 3607 Y 1
SFX 3607 t veling t
SFX 3074 Y 1
SFX 3074 l tives l
SFX 2858 Y 1
SFX 2858 e ile e
SFX 2606 Y 1
SFX 2606 t vels t
SFX 1271 Y 1
SFX 1271 s ze s
SFX 1468 Y 1
SFX 1468 e ier's e
SFX 591 Y 1
SFX 591 e izing e
SFX 222 Y 1
SFX 222 c st c
SFX 2671 Y 1
SFX 2671 d st d
SFX 4159 Y 1
SFX 4159 d ffles d
SFX 4074 Y 1
SFX 4074 g iner's g
SFX 2773 Y 1
SFX 2773 m nked m
SFX 361 Y 1
SFX 361 e iveness e
SFX 2279 Y 1
SFX 2279 y ze y
SFX 4711 Y 1
SFX 4711 n rene's n
SFX 4564 Y 1
SFX 4564 l st l
SFX 3095 Y 1
SFX 3095 c tes c
SFX 2832 Y 1
SFX 2832 g kers g
SFX 2323 Y 1
SFX 2323 s ths s
SFX 4563 Y 1
SFX 4563 m st m
SFX 4443 Y 1
SFX 4443 c ty's c
SFX 554 Y 1
SFX 554 a on's a
SFX 730 Y 1
SFX 730 n st n
SFX 3874 Y 1
SFX 3874 c on's c
SFX 3713 Y 1
SFX 3713 p st p
SFX 3105 Y 1
SFX 3105 a te a
SFX 1174 Y 1
SFX 1174 a da a
SFX 3873 Y 1
SFX 3873 d on's d
SFX 2084 Y 1
SFX 2084 c te c
SFX 1742 Y 1
SFX 1742 e ied e
SFX 774 Y 1
SFX 774 e on's e
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 r st r
SFX 3625 Y 1
SFX 3625 t unded t
SFX 1961 Y 1
SFX 1961 e ias e
SFX 1556 Y 1
SFX 1556 d ncy d
SFX 3104 Y 1
SFX 3104 e te e
SFX 325 Y 1
SFX 325 l tes l
SFX 4509 Y 1
SFX 4509 m tes m
SFX 2758 Y 1
SFX 2758 i on's i
SFX 1719 Y 1
SFX 1719 g llies g
SFX 2652 Y 1
SFX 2652 n tes n
SFX 2454 Y 1
SFX 2454 e iveness' e
SFX 4807 Y 1
SFX 4807 m on's m
SFX 4149 Y 1
SFX 4149 d fting d
SFX 459 Y 1
SFX 459 e iness's e
SFX 830 Y 1
SFX 830 n usness n
SFX 1607 Y 1
SFX 1607 d eds d
SFX 945 Y 1
SFX 945 n on's n
SFX 771 Y 1
SFX 771 r tes r
SFX 275 Y 1
SFX 275 l te l
SFX 3688 Y 1
SFX 3688 m te m
SFX 1843 Y 1
SFX 1843 s tes s
SFX 1648 Y 1
SFX 1648 s ty's s
SFX 1656 Y 1
SFX 1656 n te n
SFX 3878 Y 1
SFX 3878 a ology a
SFX 2730 Y 1
SFX 2730 n pt n
SFX 2199 Y 1
SFX 2199 a ing a
SFX 3273 Y 1
SFX 3273 m nged m
SFX 1689 Y 1
SFX 1689 m phs m
SFX 905 Y 1
SFX 905 a ic a
SFX 1450 Y 1
SFX 1450 a is a
SFX 1019 Y 1
SFX 1019 a er a
SFX 705 Y 1
SFX 705 r te r
SFX 4970 Y 1
SFX 4970 g lks g
SFX 3294 Y 1
SFX 3294 e ments e
SFX 7 Y 1
SFX 7 e ing e
SFX 1121 Y 1
SFX 1121 s te s
SFX 1701 Y 1
SFX 1701 e ology e
SFX 3300 Y 1
SFX 3300 g lter g
SFX 1775 Y 1
SFX 1775 c er c
SFX 1960 Y 1
SFX 1960 e ics's e
SFX 1016 Y 1
SFX 1016 g ing g
SFX 1096 Y 1
SFX 1096 d er d
SFX 170 Y 1
SFX 170 e ic e
SFX 3808 Y 1
SFX 3808 n rena's n
SFX 3031 Y 1
SFX 3031 s ville s
SFX 578 Y 1
SFX 578 e is e
SFX 1585 Y 1
SFX 1585 h ing h
SFX 4931 Y 1
SFX 4931 l ments l
SFX 4521 Y 1
SFX 4521 s teness s
SFX 2379 Y 1
SFX 2379 a ous a
SFX 3690 Y 1
SFX 3690 r tch's r
SFX 2849 Y 1
SFX 2849 g iner g
SFX 1465 Y 1
SFX 1465 e ifies e
SFX 654 Y 1
SFX 654 c zations c
SFX 736 Y 1
SFX 736 e ous e
SFX 4104 Y 1
SFX 4104 e ices e
SFX 3837 Y 1
SFX 3837 m pes m
SFX 1307 Y 1
SFX 1307 a ne a
SFX 4883 Y 1
SFX 4883 c ne c
SFX 3389 Y 1
SFX 3389 e ice e
SFX 3918 Y 1
SFX 3918 d ne d
SFX 1135 Y 1
SFX 1135 e ousness e
SFX 520 Y 1
SFX 520 e ne e
SFX 3442 Y 1
SFX 3442 d ffy d
SFX 3917 Y 1
SFX 3917 g ne g
SFX 4899 Y 1
SFX 4899 l nced l
SFX 4898 Y 1
SFX 4898 m nced m
SFX 4401 Y 1
SFX 4401 t under's t
SFX 2160 Y 1
SFX 2160 l ne l
SFX 4983 Y 1
SFX 4983 a les a
SFX 1906 Y 1
SFX 1906 m ne m
SFX 81 Y 1
SFX 81 e ors e
SFX 2455 Y 1
SFX 2455 e iums e
SFX 3600 Y 1
SFX 3600 p ver's p
SFX 1726 Y 1
SFX 1726 e les e
SFX 4369 Y 1
SFX 4369 r ver's r
SFX 1224 Y 1
SFX 1224 g les g
SFX 4036 Y 1
SFX 4036 d ke d
SFX 4005 Y 1
SFX 4005 h les h
SFX 1231 Y 1
SFX 1231 e isers e
SFX 655 Y 1
SFX 655 t ver's t
SFX 1014 Y 1
SFX 1014 e isation e
SFX 1597 Y 1
SFX 1597 a ey's a
SFX 2339 Y 1
SFX 2339 d sivenesses d
SFX 847 Y 1
SFX 847 g ke g
SFX 3106 Y 1
SFX 3106 p tched p
SFX 4447 Y 1
SFX 4447 r tty r
SFX 4554 Y 1
SFX 4554 d sting d
SFX 2163 Y 1
SFX 2163 d ncies d
SFX 1637 Y 1
SFX 1637 t ven t
SFX 4596 Y 1
SFX 4596 d sibility's d
SFX 1440 Y 1
SFX 1440 e izer's e
SFX 336 Y 1
SFX 336 e iness e
SFX 3317 Y 1
SFX 3317 d ller d
SFX 1127 Y 1
SFX 1127 c ser c
SFX 4968 Y 1
SFX 4968 e ller e
SFX 3093 Y 1
SFX 3093 d th d
SFX 2494 Y 1
SFX 2494 e he e
SFX 1049 Y 1
SFX 1049 e th e
SFX 1720 Y 1
SFX 1720 g ller g
SFX 1662 Y 1
SFX 1662 n sting n
SFX 1286 Y 1
SFX 1286 r sting r
SFX 1854 Y 1
SFX 1854 d sive d
SFX 3605 Y 1
SFX 3605 t ven's t
SFX 2688 Y 1
SFX 2688 n ser n
SFX 3752 Y 1
SFX 3752 p ser p
SFX 161 Y 1
SFX 161 e ities e
