lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.dic
Audi/1,16,21,2728,2729,3162,3178,3180,4718
Codee/2697
Cord/1,18,31,53,61,75,106,189,214,648,790,1394,1534,1833,2925,3057,3476,4213,4444
Harp/1,9,12,18,31,37,2701,3773,4690,4698
Inge/1,976,1621,1713,1726,1875,1876,2120,3297,4136
Inna/1,1733,4180
Lego/1,3823
Melon/53,61,3768,4641
Mombasa/1,2698
Morin/3847,4578
Muse/1,1237
Nora/1,116,149,1017,1083,1321,1453,1483,1604,2238,2536
Rena/1,16,21,147,230,263,310,623,688,929,938,993,1026,1339,1839,2239,2537,2922,2923,4019,4020,4406,4408
Saba/1,623,2366
Sara/1,27,40,116,149,541,1017,1035,1036,1083,1321,1453,1483,1604,1995,1996,2239,2515,2516,2537,3347,3349
Shan/16,21,30,33,53,61,75,101,106,111,114,120,124,217,230,263,307,392,404,460,483,650,756,1059,1209,1613,1678,1785,1871,2284,2770,2771,3101,3102,3182,3183,3932,3933,4353,4656,4670,4905
Sigfrid/1,2538
Tami/1,49,107,160,640,710,2728,2729
Unisa/1606,1681
Zora/1,111,116,120,149,1017,1083,1321,1453
blue/1,2,5,6,7,10,11,13,15,17,18,26,32,63,66,84,96,97,115,122,375,380,534,564,577,721,760,819,837,886,941,966,975,990,1030,1133,1182,1384,1445,1446,1684,1800,2027,2369,2370,2550,2553,2957,3211,3443,3444,3445,3446,3827,3828,3894,4162,4261,4276,4277,4279,4336,4451
blur/1,2,26,48,57,82,97,103,179,184,221,260,582,695,1028,1122,1130,1677,2113,2114,2115,4605,4607,4611
cleat/1,2,3614,4378,4379
cocci/1,2,386,417
collegial/45,64,275,3683
cryptogram/1,2,4750
deco/15,18,19,31,178,216,218,338,364,395,627,829,913,994,1058,1298,1403,1404,1537,1674,1874,2049,2541,2542,2590,3783,3784,3785,3811,3815,4642
flat/1,2,5,10,11,17,48,57,66,82,127,183,203,221,267,327,360,418,424,437,534,602,605,819,833,864,873,874,876,928,953,966,973,974,1044,1050,1065,1272,1273,1309,1511,1522,1653,1654,1655,1729,1803,1844,1979,2081,2325,2942,3000,3075,3096,3097,3437,3438,3523,3525,3569,4163,4396,4397,4399,4400,4515,4522
hypocrite/1,2,412,624
infect/2,3,4,9,55,60,62,99,100,711,815,816,851,1159,3054
inseminate/2,6,7,23,24
laud/1,2,3,4,9,12,35,76,206,802,1107,3923,4888
lunar/2,18,805,988,1118,3682
maul/2,3,4,9,12,14,2605,3037,3280,4886
once/2,13,15,1701,2145,2759,3255,3257
pace/1,2,6,7,13,15,18,19,69,290,572,684,811,1323,1463,1464,1465,1467,1588,1952,2203,2346,2477,3377,4614
pressure/903,1014,1075,1156,1233
prim/2,3,4,5,8,9,10,11,12,14,16,17,28,29,32,109,113,142,190,231,237,245,285,331,409,494,513,537,646,761,788,1709,2397,2561,2769,2837,3166,3262,3265,3281,3561,3562,3563,3893,3928,4054,4055,4841,4842,4843
propaganda/1,2,4065
punctual/5,10,11,45,58,64,272,275,288,309,325,351,387,2644,3079
quip/1,2,109,113,207,357,451,516,891,1132,1205,1207,1864,2108,2361,2703,2704
redefine/2,6,7,13,780,813,814
relate/19,211,403,552,1615,2453
remap/2,109,113,3780,4654
rogue/1,2,6,7,103,128,141,577,1319,1445,1446,1938
routine/5,491,492,544,545,560,574,591,592
sail/1,2,3,4,9,12,29,32,100,105,118,284,330,534,819,864,946,966,973,974,1491,1553,1880,1897,2017,2018,2025,2130,2131,2252,3263,3892,4839
shin/1,2,3,4,8,9,12,14,16,18,34,36,51,56,72,74,151,159,264,333,669,670,708,750,785,1104,1346,1347,1680,1761,2112,2213,2214,2362,2705,2720,3171,3422,4650
shoe/1,2,3,15,50,520,572,684,811,823,1011,1873,1965,1966,2073,2120,2426,2486,2635,2636,3193,3705,3743,4025,4549,4606,4682,4717
slug/1,2,131,135,276,362,402,1016,2166,2415,2416,2417
snag/1,2,131,135,846,847,1152,1153,1229,1457,1459,1460,2474
spoon/1,2,3,4,108,432,671,3796,3812,4276,4277
steep/2,3,4,5,9,10,12,17,38,83,88,125,153,224,296,297,1132,1205,1872,2056
stem/1,2,50,231,237,873,874,1044,4851
strip/1,2,3,4,8,9,12,16,18,21,34,36,46,109,113,207,250,251,312,1823,2056,2602,3032,3035,3600,4368
subside/163,369,452,1014,1075,1156,1233,4117
suspicion/1,2,3,4,603,801,830,924
swoon/2,3,4,9,51,2686,3742,3744,3747
syllabic/2,45,89,102,104,142,190,241,266,4157
systematic/10,28,76,366,377,393,396,429,440,601,654,727,733,734,828,921,984,1125,1126,1127
tail/1,2,3,4,9,12,29,32,50,100,105,118,164,196,284,375,444,501,639,663,773,779,895,946,1242,1553,1880,2015,2016,2132,2133,2734,3263,3431,3583,3892,4334,4355
untie/2,6,4682
villa/2,2295,2296
whoop/2,3,4,9,12,14,229,384,1389,1667,1857,2104,3748
